apertium-guj.guj.dix
    <pardef n="સારો__adj"> <!-- declinable/variable adjectives -->
      <e><p><l>ો</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ી</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ી</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ી</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ી</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ું</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ાં</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ાં</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ાં</l><r>ો<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="આજે__adv"> <!-- indeclinable/invariable -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="int__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->        
<!-- 1st person -->
    <pardef n="હું__prn">
      <e><p><l>હું</l><r>હું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>મેં</l><r>હું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>મને</l><r>હું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>મારું</l><r>હું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>મારો</l><r>હું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>મારી</l><r>હું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="અમે__prn">
<!-- exclusive -->
      <e><p><l>અમે</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>અમે</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>અમને</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>અમારું</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>અમારો</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>અમારી</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
<!-- inclusive -->
      <e><p><l>આપણે</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>આપણે</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>આપણને</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>આપણું</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>આપણો</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>આપણી</l><r>અમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- 2nd person -->

    <pardef n="તું__prn">
      <e><p><l>તું</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તેં</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તને</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તારું</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તારો</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તારી</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

<!-- informal/familiar -->
      <e><p><l>તું</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="fam"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તેં</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="fam"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તને</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="fam"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તારું</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="fam"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તારો</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="fam"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તારી</l><r>તું<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="fam"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="તમે__prn">
<!-- formal -->
      <e><p><l>તમે</l><r>તમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તમે</l><r>તમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તમને</l><r>તમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તમારું</l><r>તમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તમારો</l><r>તમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>તમારી</l><r>તમે<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- 3rd person -->
    <pardef n="p3__prn_dst">  <!-- FIXME: to be completed-->
	<e><p><l>તે</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>તેને</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>તેનું</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>તેની</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>તેના</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

	<e><p><l>તેઓ</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

	<e><p><l>તેમણે</l><r>તે<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="p3__prn_prx">  <!-- FIXME: to be completed-->
		<e><p><l>આ</l><r>આ<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prn__itg"> <!-- FIXME: to be completed-->
          <e><p><l>શું</l><r>શું<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- SECTION:  Nouns -->     

<!--Marked nouns with declensional vowel terminations -->
	<!-- masculine -->
    <pardef n="છોકરો__n_m"> 
       <e><p><l>ો</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ા</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>
       <e><p><l>ાઓ</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="noun__post"/></e>

       <e><p><l>ે</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ે</l><r>ો<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="હું"><i></i><par n="હું__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="અમે"><i></i><par n="અમે__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="તું"><i></i><par n="તું__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="તમે"><i></i><par n="તમે__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="તમે"><i></i><par n="તમે__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="તે"><i></i><par n="p3__prn_dst"/></e>
    <e lm="આ"><i></i><par n="p3__prn_prx"/></e>
    <e lm="શું"><i></i><par n="prn__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="છોકરો"><i>છોકર</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ડાઘો"><i>ડાઘ</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="મહિનો"><i>મહિન</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="કચરો"><i>કચર</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="બગીચો"><i>બગીચ</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="કૂતરો"><i>કૂતર</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="બચ્ચો"><i>બચ્ચ</i><par n="છોકરો__n_m"/></e>
    	<e lm="સારો"><i>સાર</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="નાનો"><i>નાન</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="મોટો"><i>મોટ</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="કાળો"><i>કાળ</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="ઠંડો"><i>ઠંડ</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="બધો"><i>બધ</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="પૂરો"><i>પૂર</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="પૂરો"><i>પૂર</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="જૂનો"><i>જૂન</i><par n="સારો__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="આજે"><i>આજે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="કાલે"><i>કાલે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ગઇકાલે"><i>ગઇકાલે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="પરમદિવસે"><i>પરમદિવસે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="સવારે"><i>સવારે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="બપોરે"><i>બપોરે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="સાંજે"><i>સાંજે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="હંમેશા"><i>હંમેશા</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="હવે"><i>હવે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="અત્યારે"><i>અત્યારે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="યહીં"><i>યહીં</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ત્યાં"><i>ત્યાં</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ક્યાંય"><i>ક્યાંય</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="પાસે"><i>પાસે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="દૂર"><i>દૂર</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="બાહર"><i>બાહર</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ક્યાં"><i>ક્યાં</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="કેમ"><i>કેમ</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="જ્યાં"><i>જ્યાં</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="જયારે"><i>જયારે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ક્યારે"><i>ક્યારે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ત્યારે"><i>ત્યારે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="નહીં"><i>નહીં</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="નહી"><i>નહી</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ના"><i>ન</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ન"><i>ન</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ચોક્કસ"><i>ચોક્કસ</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="પણ"><i>પણ</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="પછી"><i>પછી</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="તો"><i>તો</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ધીમે-ધીમે"><i>ધીમે-ધીમે</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="કંઇ"><i>કંઇ</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="નથી"><i>નથી</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="ફરીથી"><i>ફરીથી</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="પાછળથી"><i>પાછળથી</i><par n="આજે__adv"/></e>
